computational_morphology/rules.regex
# Replace Rules
[ e l -> l || _ \.#. ] # el changes to l when an ending is present
.o.
[ e r -> r || _ \.#. ] # er changes to r when an ending is present
.o.
[ e n -> n || _ \.#. ] # en changes to n when an ending is present
.o.

#special case for 'hoch': becomes 'höh-' when an ending is present
[ h o c h -> h o h || _ \.#. ];
